Missouri, session 2026, HB2634.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 192.2410, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 192.2410, to read as follows:
192.2410. 1. A report made under section 192.2405 shall be made orally or in
writing. It shall include, if known:
(1) The name, age, and address of the eligible adult;
(2) The name and address of any person responsible for care of the eligible adult;
(3) The nature and extent of the condition of the eligible adult; and
(4) Other relevant information.
2. Reports regarding persons determined not to be eligible adults as defined in section
192.2400 shall be referred to the appropriate state or local authorities.
3. The department shall maintain a statewide toll-free phone number for receipt of
reports and shall operate the hotline continuously for twenty-four hours a day, seven
days a week.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.